Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 4.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-4827
Who may make anatomical gift before
donor's death.

Subject to section 71-4831, an anatomical gift of a donor's
body or part may be made during the life of the donor for the purpose of transplantation,
therapy, research, or education in the manner provided in section 71-4828
by:

(1)
The donor, if the donor is an adult or if the donor is a minor and is:

(A)
Emancipated; or

(B) Authorized under state law to apply for a driver's license and
the donor is at least sixteen years of age;

(2) An agent of the donor, unless the power
of attorney for health care or other record prohibits the agent from making
an anatomical gift;

(3) A parent of the donor, if the donor
is an unemancipated minor; or

(4) The donor's guardian.

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 4.